Missouri, session 2026, HB3209.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 116.155 as enacted by senate bill no. 22, one hundred third general
assembly, first regular session, section 116.155 as enacted by house bill no. 676, ninetieth
general assembly, first regular session, section 116.160 as enacted by senate bill no. 22, one
hundred third general assembly, first regular session, section 116.160 as enacted by house bill
no. 676, ninetieth general assembly, first regular session, section 116.190 as enacted by senate
bill no. 22, one hundred third general assembly, first regular session, section 116.190 as
enacted by senate bill no. 104, ninety-eighth general assembly, first regular session, section
116.334 as enacted by senate bill no. 22, one hundred third general assembly, first regular
session, and section 116.334 as enacted by house bill no. 117, ninety-seventh general
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3209 2
assembly, first regular session, are repealed and four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 116.155, 116.160, 116.190, and 116.334, to read as follows:
[116.155. 1. The general assembly may include the official summary
statement and a fiscal note summary in any statewide ballot measure that it
refers to the voters.
2. The official summary statement approved by the general assembly
shall, taken together with the approved fiscal note summary, be the official
ballot title and such summary statement shall contain no more than one
hundred words, excluding articles. The title shall be a true and impartial
statement of the purposes of the proposed measure in language neither
intentionally argumentative nor likely to create prejudice either for or against
the proposed measure.
3. The fiscal note summary approved by the general assembly shall
contain no more than fifty words, excluding articles, which shall summarize
the fiscal note prepared for the measure in language neither argumentative nor
likely to create prejudice for or against the proposed measure.]
116.155. 1. The general assembly may include the official summary statement and a
fiscal note summary in any statewide ballot measure that it refers to the voters.
2. The official summary statement approved by the general assembly shall, taken
together with the approved fiscal note summary, be the official ballot title and such summary
statement shall contain no more than [fifty] one hundredwords, excluding articles. The title
shall be a true and impartial statement of the purposes of the proposed measure in language
neither intentionally argumentative nor likely to create prejudice either for or against the
proposed measure.
3. The fiscal note summary approved by the general assembly shall contain no more
than fifty words, excluding articles, which shall summarize the fiscal note prepared for the
measure in language neither argumentative nor likely to create prejudice for or against the
proposed measure.
[116.160. 1. If the general assembly adopts a joint resolution
proposing a constitutional amendment or a bill without a fiscal note summary,
which is to be referred to a vote of the people, after receipt of such resolution
or bill the secretary of state shall promptly forward the resolution or bill to the
state auditor. If the general assembly adopts a joint resolution proposing a
constitutional amendment or a bill without an official summary statement,
which is to be referred to a vote of the people, within twenty days after receipt
of the resolution or bill, the secretary of state shall prepare and transmit to the
attorney general a summary statement of the measure as the proposed
summary statement. The secretary of state may seek the advice of the
legislator who introduced the constitutional amendment or bill and the speaker
of the house or the president pro tem of the legislative chamber that originated
the measure. The summary statement may be distinct from the legislative title

HB 3209 3
of the proposed constitutional amendment or bill. The attorney general shall
within ten days approve the legal content and form of the proposed statement.
2. If the general assembly adopts a joint resolution proposing a
constitutional amendment or statutory measure that includes an official
summary statement, the statement shall appear on the ballot, unless it is
challenged pursuant to section 116.190, in which case the provisions of that
section shall apply.
3. The official summary statement shall contain no more than one
hundred words, excluding articles. The title shall be a true and impartial
statement of the purposes of the proposed measure in language neither
intentionally argumentative nor likely to create prejudice either for or against
the proposed measure.]
116.160. 1. If the general assembly adopts a joint resolution proposing a
constitutional amendment or a bill without a fiscal note summary, which is to be referred to a
vote of the people, after receipt of such resolution or bill the secretary of state shall promptly
forward the resolution or bill to the state auditor. If the general assembly adopts a joint
resolution proposing a constitutional amendment or a bill without an official summary
statement, which is to be referred to a vote of the people, within twenty days after receipt of
the resolution or bill, the secretary of state shall prepare and transmit to the attorney general a
summary statement of the measure as the proposed summary statement. The secretary of
state may seek the advice of the legislator who introduced the constitutional amendment or
bill and the speaker of the house or the president pro tem of the legislative chamber that
originated the measure. The summary statement may be distinct from the legislative title of
the proposed constitutional amendment or bill. The attorney general shall within ten days
approve the legal content and form of the proposed statement.
2. If the general assembly adopts a joint resolution proposing a constitutional
amendment or statutory measure that includes an official summary statement, the
statement shall appear on the ballot, unless it is challenged pursuant to section 116.190,
in which case the provisions of that section shall apply.
3. The official summary statement shall contain no more than [fifty] one hundred
words, excluding articles. The title shall be a true and impartial statement of the purposes of
the proposed measure in language neither intentionally argumentative nor likely to create
prejudice either for or against the proposed measure.
[116.190. 1. Any citizen who wishes to challenge the official ballot
title or the fiscal note prepared for a proposed constitutional amendment
submitted by the general assembly, by initiative petition, or by constitutional
convention, or for a statutory initiative or referendum measure, may bring an
action in the circuit court of Cole County. The action shall be brought within
ten days after the official ballot title is certified by the secretary of state in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter, in the case of an initiative

HB 3209 4
petition and not later than the twenty-second Tuesday prior to the general
election at which the ballot measure will be submitted to the voters, in the case
of all other statewide ballot measures.
2. The secretary of state shall be named as a party defendant in any
action challenging the official ballot title prepared by the secretary of state.
When the action challenges the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary prepared
by the auditor, the state auditor shall also be named as a party defendant. The
president pro tem of the senate, the speaker of the house and the sponsor of the
measure and the secretary of state shall be the named party defendants in any
action challenging the official summary statement, fiscal note or fiscal note
summary prepared pursuant to section 116.155.
3. The petition shall state the reason or reasons why the summary
statement portion of the official ballot title is insufficient or unfair.
Alternatively, the petition shall state the reasons why the fiscal note or the
fiscal note summary portion of the official ballot title is insufficient or unfair
and shall request a different fiscal note or fiscal note summary portion of the
official ballot title.
4. (1) The action shall be placed at the top of the civil docket.
(2) (a) Insofar as the action challenges the summary statement portion
of the official ballot title, the court shall consider the petition, hear arguments,
and in its decision certify the summary statement portion of the official ballot
title to the secretary of state as originally written if the court finds the summary
statement to be sufficient and fair. If the court finds the summary statement to
be insufficient or unfair, the court may offer suggested revisions for the
summary statement to remedy the legal flaws, but it shall, in its decision, order
the secretary of state to write a first revised summary statement that is
sufficient and fair.
(b) The secretary of state shall submit a first revised summary
statement to the court within seven days. If, after submission to the court of a
first revised summary statement by the secretary of state, the court finds the
first revised summary statement to be sufficient and fair, the court shall certify
to the secretary of state that statement and order it to appear on the ballot. If
the court finds the first revised summary statement to be insufficient or unfair,
the court may offer suggested revisions for the statement to remedy the legal
flaws, but it shall, in its decision, order the secretary of state to write a second
revised summary statement that is sufficient and fair.
(c) The secretary of state shall submit a second revised summary
statement to the court within five days. If, after submission to the court of a
second revised summary statement by the secretary of state, the court finds the
second revised summary statement to be sufficient and fair, the court shall
certify to the secretary of state that statement and order it to appear on the
ballot. If the court finds the second revised summary statement to be
insufficient or unfair, the court may offer suggested revisions for the statement
to remedy the legal flaws, but it shall, in its decision, order the secretary of
state to write a third revised summary statement that is sufficient and fair.
(d) The secretary of state shall submit a third revised summary
statement to the court within three days. If, after submission to the court of a
third revised summary statement by the secretary of state, the court finds the

HB 3209 5
third revised summary statement to be sufficient and fair, the court shall certify
to the secretary of state that statement and order it to appear on the ballot. If
the court finds the third revised summary statement to be insufficient or unfair,
or if the secretary of state neglects or refuses to submit any of the revised
summary statements within the times mandated by this subdivision when so
ordered, the court shall revise the summary statement in a manner that is
sufficient and fair and order the secretary of state to place that summary
statement on the ballot with the measure.
(e) During all revisions as provided in this subdivision, the case shall
remain open.
(f) Any nonprevailing party may make appeals as provided by law
only following:
a. The finding of the circuit court that a summary statement was
sufficient and fair; or
b. The circuit court ordering its own summary statement to be placed
on the ballot pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subdivision.
(g) Any action brought pursuant to this section challenging a statewide
ballot measure appearing on the ballot at an election called by the governor
pursuant to Article XII, Section 2(b), Missouri Constitution, whether at the
primary election or at a special election, or at a special election for a
referendum petition measure called by the general assembly pursuant to
Article III, Section 52(b), Missouri Constitution, shall be expedited by the
court to bring a resolution of the matter prior to the printing of ballots. The
court may shorten any timeframe under this section to achieve this purpose.
(3) Insofar as the action challenges the fiscal note or the fiscal note
summary portion of the official ballot title, the court shall consider the
petition, hear arguments, and in its decision, either certify the fiscal note or the
fiscal note summary portion of the official ballot title to the secretary of state
or remand the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary to the auditor for
preparation of a new fiscal note or fiscal note summary pursuant to the
procedures set forth in section 116.175. Any party to the suit may appeal to
the supreme court within ten days after a circuit court decision pursuant to this
subdivision.
5. Any action brought under this section that is not fully and finally
adjudicated within one hundred eighty days of filing, and more than seventy
days prior to election in which the measure is to appear, including all appeals,
shall be extinguished, unless a court extends such period upon a finding of
good cause for such extension. Such good cause shall consist only of court-
related scheduling issues and shall not include requests for continuance by the
parties.]
116.190. 1. Any citizen who wishes to challenge the official ballot title or the fiscal
note prepared for a proposed constitutional amendment submitted by the general assembly, by
initiative petition, or by constitutional convention, or for a statutory initiative or referendum
measure, may bring an action in the circuit court of Cole County. The action [must] shall be
brought within ten days after the official ballot title is certified by the secretary of state in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter in the case of an initiative petition, and not

HB 3209 6
later than the twenty-second Tuesday prior to the general election at which the ballot
measure will be submitted to the voters, in the case of all other statewide ballot
measures.
2. The secretary of state shall be named as a party defendant in any action challenging
the official ballot title prepared by the secretary of state. When the action challenges the
fiscal note or the fiscal note summary prepared by the auditor, the state auditor shall also be
named as a party defendant. The president pro tem of the senate, the speaker of the house and
the sponsor of the measure and the secretary of state shall be the named party defendants in
any action challenging the official summary statement, fiscal note or fiscal note summary
prepared pursuant to section 116.155.
3. The petition shall state the reason or reasons why the summary statement portion of
the official ballot title is insufficient or unfair [and shall request a different summary
statement portion of the official ballot title]. Alternatively, the petition shall state the reasons
why the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary portion of the official ballot title is insufficient
or unfair and shall request a different fiscal note or fiscal note summary portion of the official
ballot title.
4. (1) The action shall be placed at the top of the civil docket.
(2) (a) Insofar as the action challenges the summary statement portion of the official
ballot title, the court shall consider the petition, hear arguments, and in its decision certify the
summary statement portion of the official ballot title to the secretary of state as originally
written if the court finds the summary statement to be sufficient and fair. If the court
finds the summary statement to be insufficient or unfair, the court may offer suggested
revisions for the summary statement to remedy the legal flaws, but it shall, in its
decision, order the secretary of state to write a first revised summary statement that is
sufficient and fair.
(b) The secretary of state shall submit a first revised summary statement to the
court within seven days if the action was originated in a year ending in an odd number,
but within three days if the action was originated in a year ending with an even number.
If, after submission to the court of a first revised summary statement by the secretary of
state, the court finds the first revised summary statement to be sufficient and fair, the
court shall certify to the secretary of state that statement and order it to appear on the
ballot. If the court finds the first revised summary statement to be insufficient or unfair,
the court may offer suggested revisions for the statement to remedy the legal flaws, but
it shall, in its decision, order the secretary of state to write a second revised summary
statement that is sufficient and fair.
(c) The secretary of state shall submit a second revised summary statement to
the court within five days if the action was originated in a year ending in an odd

HB 3209 7
number, but within two days if the action was originated in a year ending with an even
number. If, after submission to the court of a second revised summary statement by the
secretary of state, the court finds the second revised summary statement to be sufficient
and fair, the court shall certify to the secretary of state that statement and order it to
appear on the ballot. If the court finds the second revised summary statement to be
insufficient or unfair, the court may offer suggested revisions for the statement to
remedy the legal flaws, but it shall, in its decision, order the secretary of state to write a
third revised summary statement that is sufficient and fair.
(d) The secretary of state shall submit a third revised summary statement to the
court within three days if the action was originated in a year ending in an odd number,
but within one day if the action was originated in a year ending in an even number. If,
after submission to the court of a third revised summary statement by the secretary of
state, the court finds the third revised summary statement to be sufficient and fair, the
court shall certify to the secretary of state that statement and order it to appear on the
ballot. If the court finds the third revised summary statement to be insufficient or
unfair, or if the secretary of state neglects or refuses to submit any of the revised
summary statements within the times mandated by this subdivision when so ordered,
the court shall revise the summary statement in a manner that is sufficient and fair and
order the secretary of state to place that summary statement on the ballot with the
measure.
(e) During all revisions as provided in this subdivision, the case shall remain
open.
(f) Any nonprevailing party may make appeals as provided by law only
following:
a. The finding of the circuit court that a summary statement was sufficient and
fair; or
b. The circuit court ordering its own summary statement to be placed on the
ballot pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subdivision.
(g) a. In any appeal of any decision of a circuit court finding a summary
statement to be sufficient and fair pursuant to this subdivision, if the appellate court
concludes that the summary statement was in fact insufficient or unfair, the appellate
court shall remand the summary statement to the circuit for further proceedings
consistent with this subdivision. If the appellate court finds the summary statement
insufficient or unfair, the court may offer suggested revisions for the summary
statement to remedy the legal flaws, but the appellate court shall not have authority to
itself modify or rewrite the summary statement. No other relief shall issue from an
appellate court on a challenge to a circuit court's decision that a summary statement is

HB 3209 8
insufficient and unfair besides remanding the judgment to the circuit court for further
proceedings consistent with this section.
b. Notwithstanding subparagraph a. of this paragraph to the contrary, if an
action brought under this section has not been fully and finally adjudicated within one
hundred fifty-two days of filing, or if there are less than ninety-eight days until the
election at which the measure is to appear, the provisions of subparagraph a. of this
paragraph requiring the appellate court to remand the summary statement to the
circuit court shall not apply and an appeal to the supreme court shall be permitted. If,
upon such appeal, the supreme court finds the summary statement insufficient or unfair,
the court may offer suggested revisions for the summary statement to remedy the legal
flaws, but the supreme court shall not have authority to itself modify or rewrite the
summary statement. No other relief shall issue from the supreme court on a challenge to
a circuit court's decision that a summary statement is sufficient and fair besides
remanding the judgment to the circuit court for further proceedings consistent with this
section.
(h) Any action brought pursuant to this section challenging a statewide ballot
measure appearing on the ballot at an election called by the governor pursuant to
Article XII, Section 2(b), Missouri Constitution, whether at the primary election or at a
special election, or at a special election for a referendum petition measure called by the
100 general assembly pursuant to Article III, Section 52(b), Missouri Constitution, shall be
101 expedited by the court to bring a resolution of the matter prior to the printing of ballots.
102 The court may shorten any timeframe under this section to achieve this purpose.
103 (3) Insofar as the action challenges the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary portion
104 of the official ballot title, the court shall consider the petition, hear arguments, and in its
105 decision, either certify the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary portion of the official ballot
106 title to the secretary of state or remand the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary to the auditor
107 for preparation of a new fiscal note or fiscal note summary pursuant to the procedures set
108 forth in section 116.175. Any party to the suit may appeal to the supreme court within ten
109 days after a circuit court decision pursuant to this subdivision. [In making the legal notice
110 to election authorities under section 116.240, and for the purposes of section 116.180, the
111 secretary of state shall certify the language which the court certifies to him.]
112 5. Any action brought under this section that is not fully and finally adjudicated
113 within one hundred eighty days of filing, and more than [fifty-six] seventy days prior to the
114 election in which the measure is to appear, including all appeals, shall be extinguished, unless
115 a court extends such period upon a finding of good cause for such extension. Such good
116 cause shall consist only of court-related scheduling issues and shall not include requests for
117 continuance by the parties.

HB 3209 9
[116.334. 1. If the petition form is approved, the secretary of state
shall make a copy of the sample petition available on the secretary of state's
website. For a period of fifteen days after the petition is approved as to form,
the secretary of state shall accept public comments regarding the proposed
measure and provide copies of such comments upon request. Within twenty-
three days of receipt of such approval, the secretary of state shall prepare and
transmit to the attorney general a summary statement of the measure which
shall be a concise statement not exceeding one hundred words. This statement
shall be in the form of a question using language neither intentionally
argumentative nor likely to create prejudice either for or against the proposed
measure. The attorney general shall within ten days approve the legal content
and form of the proposed statement.
2. Signatures obtained prior to the date the official ballot title is
certified by the secretary of state shall not be counted. Once the secretary of
state certifies the official ballot title, signatures may be collected, even if the
ballot title is subject to an action in court challenging the sufficiency and
fairness of the ballot title. If a court orders a change that alters the content of
the official ballot title, then all signatures gathered before such change
occurred shall not be invalidated based upon the fact that one or more
signatures were gathered prior to the alteration of the official ballot title,
regardless of whether those signatures were gathered on petition pages that
displayed what was previously the official ballot title as certified by the
secretary of state. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the invalidation of a
signature for a reason otherwise allowed by this chapter.
3. Signatures for statutory initiative petitions shall be filed not later
than six months prior to the general election during which the petition's ballot
measure is submitted for a vote, and shall also be collected not earlier than the
day after the day upon which the previous general election was held.]
116.334. 1. If the petition form is approved, the secretary of state shall make a copy
of the sample petition available on the secretary of state's website. For a period of fifteen
days after the petition is approved as to form, the secretary of state shall accept public
comments regarding the proposed measure and provide copies of such comments upon
request. Within twenty-three days of receipt of such approval, the secretary of state shall
prepare and transmit to the attorney general a summary statement of the measure which shall
be a concise statement not exceeding one hundred words. This statement shall be in the form
of a question using language neither intentionally argumentative nor likely to create prejudice
either for or against the proposed measure. The attorney general shall within ten days
approve the legal content and form of the proposed statement.
2. Signatures obtained prior to the date the official ballot title is certified by the
secretary of state shall not be counted. Once the secretary of state certifies the official
ballot title, signatures may be collected, even if the ballot title is subject to an action in
court challenging the sufficiency and fairness of the ballot title. If a court orders a
change that alters the content of the official ballot title, then all signatures gathered

HB 3209 10
before such change occurred shall not be invalidated based upon the fact that one or
more signatures were gathered prior to the alteration of the official ballot title,
regardless of whether those signatures were gathered on petition pages that displayed
what was previously the official ballot title as certified by the secretary of state. Nothing
in this subsection shall prohibit the invalidation of a signature for a reason otherwise
allowed by this chapter.
3. Signatures for statutory initiative petitions shall be filed not later than six months
prior to the general election during which the petition's ballot measure is submitted for a vote,
and shall also be collected not earlier than the day after the day upon which the previous
general election was held.
✔